en-Academic.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwzESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWZ'
NOSUGGEST !


# character conversions
ICONV 1
ICONV ’ '


# ordinal numbers
# COMPOUNDMIN 1
# only in compounds: 1th, 2th, 3th
# ONLYINCOMPOUND c
# compound rules:
# 1. [0-9]*1[0-9]th (10th, 11th, 12th, 56714th, etc.)
# 2. [0-9]*[02-9](1st|2nd|3rd|[4-9]th) (21st, 22nd, 123rd, 1234th, etc.)
# COMPOUNDRULE 3
# COMPOUNDRULE n*1t
# COMPOUNDRULE n*mp

COMPOUNDMIN 2      # 
COMPOUNDWORDMAX 7
CHECKCOMPOUNDDUP   # Forbid word duplication in compounds (e.g. foofoo).
COMPOUNDMORESUFFIXES

# compound rules
# m: multiplicity: mono-, di-, tri-
# h: Hydrocarbons: -meth-, -eth-, -prop-
# a: no suffix, e.g. element names
COMPOUNDRULE 5
COMPOUNDRULE d*u   # for SI units: digit*unit e.g. 3ms
COMPOUNDRULE m?hxp?m?hs # for chemicals: prefix*chemical+suffix, e.g. di+meth+anol
COMPOUNDRULE p?m?hs
COMPOUNDRULE p?m?hx
COMPOUNDRULE m*a





# Prefixes  A:re B:dis, C:con, E: de, F: pro
# --------------------------------------------
PFX A Y 1
PFX A   0     re         .

PFX I Y 1
PFX I   0     in         .

PFX U Y 1
PFX U   0     un         .

PFX C Y 1
PFX C   0     de          .

PFX E Y 1
PFX E   0     dis         .

PFX F Y 1
PFX F   0     con         .

PFX K Y 1
PFX K   0     pro         .


# Suffixes
# --------------------------------------------


# Gerund
SFX G Y 3
SFX G   e     ing        [^eoy]e
SFX G   0     ing        [eoy]e 
SFX G   0     ing        [^e] 


# Gerund with doubled consonant: open => openning?? honor [^aeiou][aeiou][bkdmnprt]/
# does not work
# SFX Gd Y 8
# SFX 0 bing [^aeiou][aeiou]b
# SFX 0 king [^aeiou][aeiou]c
# SFX 0 ding [^aeiou][aeiou]d
# SFX 0 ming [^aeiou][aeiou]m
# SFX 0 ning [^aeiou][aeiou]n
# SFX 0 ping [^aeiou][aeiou]p
# SFX 0 ring [^aeiou][aeiou]r
# SFX 0 ting [^aeiou][aeiou]t


SFX D Y 4
SFX D   0     d          e
SFX D   y     ied        [^aeiou]y
SFX D   0     ed         [^ey]
SFX D   0     ed         [aeiou]y


# adjective comparative, superlative
SFX R Y 4
SFX R   0     r          e
SFX R   y     ier        [^aeiou]y
SFX R   0     er         [aeiou]y
SFX R   0     er         [^ey]

SFX T N 4
SFX T   0     st         e
SFX T   y     iest       [^aeiou]y
SFX T   0     est        [aeiou]y
SFX T   0     est        [^ey]

# adverbs
SFX Y Y 4
SFX Y   y     ily        y
SFX Y   0     ally       ic
SFX Y   e     y          ble
SFX Y   0     ly         [^cy]

# adjective to noun
SFX P Y 3
SFX P   y     iness      [^aeiou]y
SFX P   0     ness       [aeiou]y
SFX P   0     ness       [^y]

# plural
SFX S Y 5
SFX S   y     ies        [^aeiou]y
SFX S   0     s          [aeiou]y
SFX S   0     es         [sxz]
SFX S   0     es         [cs][h]   # graphs / spee[ch] / cra[sh]  => only [sc]h !
SFX S   0     s          [^sxzy]

# possesive
SFX M Y 2
SFX M   0     's         [^sz]
SFX M   0     '          [sz]


# deprected suffixes
SFX B Y 3
SFX B   0     able       [^aeiou]
SFX B   0     able       ee
SFX B   e     able       [^aeiou]e

SFX L Y 1
SFX L   0     ment       .

SFX Z Y 4
SFX Z   0     rs         e
SFX Z   y     iers       [^aeiou]y
SFX Z   0     ers        [aeiou]y
SFX Z   0     ers        [^ey]

SFX V N 2
SFX V   e     ive        e
SFX V   0     ive        [^e]

SFX N Y 3
SFX N   e     ion        e
SFX N   y     ication    y 
SFX N   0     en         [^ey] 

SFX X Y 3
SFX X   e     ions       e
SFX X   y     ications   y
SFX X   0     ens        [^ey]

SFX H N 2
SFX H   y     ieth       y
SFX H   0     th         [^y] 

SFX J Y 2
SFX J   e     ings       e
SFX J   0     ings       [^e]




# Mappings for suggestion
MAP 5
MAP ﬁ(fi)
MAP ﬂ(fl)
MAP ﬀ(ff)
MAP ﬆ(st)
MAP ﬃ(ffi)


# break words into two at these characters
# BREAK 4
# BREAK -
# BREAK ^-
# BREAK -$
# BREAK —


# REP able$ ible
# REP able$ ably
# REP ^de dis
# REP ^de un
# REP ^dis de
# REP ^dis un
# REP ^un dis
# REP ^un de
# REP ^eventbased$ event-based


## Options for suggestions

# specify neighboring keys
KEY qwertzuop|yxcvbnm|asdfghjkl|qaw|wse|edr|rft|tgz|zhu|uji|iko|olp|ays|sxd|dcf|fvg|gbh|hnj|jmk






# word replacing
REP 100
REP ^witch$ which      # full words
REP ^angel$ angle
REP ^though$ although
REP ^fist$ first
REP ^alot$ a_lot
REP ^worstcase$ worst-case
REP ^realtime$ real-time
REP ^whilst$ while
REP ^amongst$ among
REP ic$ ical         # endings
REP ical$ ic
REP a ei               # defaults
REP ei a
REP a ey
REP ey a
REP ai ie
REP ie ai
REP are air
REP are ear
REP are eir
REP air are
REP air ere
REP ere air
REP ere ear
REP ere eir
REP ear are
REP ear air
REP ear ere
REP eir are
REP eir ere
REP ch te
REP te ch
REP ch ti
REP ti ch
REP ch tu
REP tu ch
REP ch s
REP s ch
REP ch k
REP k ch
REP f ph
REP ph f
REP gh f
REP f gh
REP i igh
REP igh i
REP i uy
REP uy i
REP i ee
REP ee i
REP j di
REP di j
REP j gg
REP gg j
REP j ge
REP ge j
REP s ti
REP ti s
REP s ci
REP ci s
REP k cc
REP cc k
REP k qu
REP qu k
REP kw qu
REP o eau
REP eau o
REP o ew
REP ew o
REP oo ew
REP ew oo
REP ew ui
REP ui ew
REP oo ui
REP ui oo
REP ew u
REP u ew
REP oo u
REP u oo
REP u oe
REP oe u
REP u ieu
REP ieu u
REP ue ew
REP ew ue
REP uff ough
REP oo ieu
REP ieu oo
REP ier ear
REP ear ier
REP ear air
REP air ear
REP w qu
REP qu w
REP z ss
REP ss z
REP shun tion
REP shun sion
REP shun cion
REP size cise
