en-Academic.dic
Faraday/M
Jordanian/S
Launchpad/M
Toshiba/M
Uruguayan/S
abuse/DSGV
accountably/U
accuse/SDG
acronym/SM
activate/CGDS
activation/ACM
active/AIY
adaptive/UYP
addict/GVSD
additional/Y
adhesive/YP
adjust/SDG
adjustable/U
admire/B
advantage/EMS
adversarial/Y
advise/DSZGB
afford/DSGB
age/MGDS
agree/EDSG
agreement/ESM
allocate/SDG
allow/BGSD
alphabetical/Y
ambiguity/SM
amortize/LBDSG
ancestor/SM
annual/Y
apologize/DSG
appear/AESGD
applicability/I
applicable/I
applicably/I
appoint/ESDG
architect/SM
architectonic/S
arithmetical/UY
arrange/AGDS
articulate/SDG
assure/AGDS
astronaut/SM
asymptotical/Y
attach/LGDS
attain/SDG
attempt/GMDS
attitude/MS
attract/SDGV
authoritative/YP
availability/USM
avoidable/U
aware/P
baffle/SDG
balance/ASDG
base/DSMGL
battery/SM
beast/MS
behavioral/Y
believable/U
bend/SG
blast/DSG
body/SM
bright/RYPT
broad/RTY
broadcast/AGMS
broker/MS
brush/MSRDGZ
bug/CS
built/A
bureaucratic/UY
bytecode/MS
call/MASGD
capable/I
capitulate/ASDG
celebration/MS
cell/SM
central/Y
centralization/CSM
centralize/CSDAG
certification/ACM
chain/MSDG
changeability/U
changeably/U
charge/EDSMG
chart/MRS
cheap/RYT
circumstance/SM
clarify/GNDS
classification/ACS
clean/YRT
clear/YRT
clever/TR
clone/SM
close/DRSMYTG
code/CGDS
coherence/CIS
coherency/IS
coherent/IY
cohesive/UPY
collaborative/Y
collate/DSG
collect/ADVGS
combustion/MS
come/IG
comfortable/U
comparable/UP
compatibility/I
compatible/I
competence/IS
competency/IS
competent/I
competitive/UY
compilation/CMS
compile/CDSG
compiler/CMS
compliant/I
comply/SDG
compose/CSDG
composer/CMS
composition/CAMS
comprehensible/I
conceive/GBDS
concentration/MS
concept/SM
conclude/DSG
conditional/UY
configurability/AS
configuration/ASM
confirm/ASDG
congruent/IY
connect/EASDG
conscious/PY
consider/BGDS
constitute/SDG
construction/AMS
contamination/CM
contemplate/SDG
continue/EDSG
contrive/DSG
convert/MDRGS
coolant/SM
cooperative/UYP
correct/SGDYP
countable/U
counterbalance/MSDG
countermeasure/S
couple/UCDSG
cover/EADGS
create/ADSG
creative/UY
credible/I
crowd/SGMD
currency/FMS
current/FY
cyclist/SM
cylindrical/Y
dangle/SDG
dark/P
debate/BMGDS
decidable/U
decline/SDG
deep/TRY
defect/MVS
defense/V
define/AGDS
definite/YV
degenerate/SDG
demonstrate/SDG
dependence/I
dependent/IY
deploy/ALGDSB
derivative/YMSP
describe/SDG
design/AMSDG
detect/DBSGV
determinist/SM
deterministic/IY
devastate/SDG
devious/Y
did/U
dielectric/MS
dig/TS
dine/GDRS
distinct/YV
distinguish/DSG
divisible/I
doc/S
document/GSMD
done/UF
doubt/MS
dreadful/Y
early/RT
easy/RT
ecosystem/SM
educate/GDS
effective/PY
efficient/IY
elasticity/I
embarrass/LGDS
emerge/DSG
empirical/UY
encoding/MS
encourage/GLDS
endian/P
ending/MS
endless/Y
enhance/DSGL
enjoy/SDGBL
enlighten/DGLS
enrich/GDSL
entangle/ESGD
entanglement/MSE
entertain/SGDL
enumerable/U
equip/LS
erase/DRSG
establish/DSG
exabyte/S
exchangeable/UY
excite/GLDS
excusable/IY
executive/SM
exemplary/P
exhaustive/UPY
expect/DGS
expectable/UY
expense/SMV
explore/DSG
explosive/S
expressive/PYI
extrinsic/U
faint/RT
fair/RYTP
fashion/SGBD
fast/RT
fault/CSM
favor/SGMDB
feasibility/IS
fender/SM
few/RT
fictional/Y
field/SM
fight/GSR
fine/RT
fire/DSMG
five/R
fix/DSG
flexible/I
focus/UAGSD
forge/SDG
form/IASGD
formal/IY
formulation/AS
fortunate/UY
four/H
friendly/URTP
frog/SM
full/TR
function/GMDS
fund/GSMD
funny/RT
fuzz/DSGRZ
general/Y
generation/MS
geometrical/UY
good/PS
gratuitous/Y
great/RYT
green/RT
grow/SGH
guest/MS
hang/SDG
happy/TPR
hard/RYT
harden/SGD
harmonic/IY
head/GSMD
healthy/U
heavy/RT
high/RYT
honest/EY
iPhone/SM
icy/RST
ill/P
illustration/MS
immense/Y
immutable/P
implement/ADGS
impress/GVDS
incline/SDG
individualize/ESGD
inductive/YP
industry/SM
initiate/GVDS
insert/SMDG
instantiate/DSGNVX
integrate/DSG
intense/YV
intentional/Y
interception/MS
intermediary/SM
intrusive/YP
involve/LGDS
irritate/DSG
it/USM
iterative/Y
junction/F
justice/I
justify/SDG
kill/SGMDR
kind/SPY
lady/SM
large/YTR
late/RYT
lazy/P
leg/MS
leverage/GDS
light/YRT
like/EGDS
lithograph/GMD
localizable/U
localization/CS
log/MS
logical/Y
long/TR
loud/RYT
low/TR
mad/P
manageability/U
mark/MDGS
meaningful/Y
meeting/MS
method/MS
mind/MGDS
misread/GS
miss/EGDS
mobilization/SCMA
mobilize/CDSGA
mode/MTS
modulate/CSDG
modulation/MSC
modulator/CMS
monetization/C
move/AGDS
movie/MS
multiplex/SDG
multiplexer/MS
mutual/Y
nasty/TR
necessary/UY
neglect/SGD
new/TRY
nonarithmetic/MSY
nor/H
normalization/ACMS
normalized/UC
numb/T
obfuscation/MS
object/SMDGV
objection/SMB
occupy/DSG
offense/MVS
old/TR
open/SDG
optimal/Y
orchestrate/SDG
order/AGMDS
overestimation/MS
overproduce/SDG
overshoot/SG
parabolic/PY
parallelize/GDRS
participation/MS
particularize/ZGDRS
pass/GVMDS
patentable/U
pend/CGDS
pendulum/MS
persecute/DSG
persist/SDG
photographic/Y
phrase/AMGDS
place/AEDSG
placement/AEMS
play/AEGSMD
plugin/MS
polarization/SCM
polish/SDG
polite/P
poor/RYT
port/ASMDG
portion/KMS
pose/KEGSD
postulate/SDG
pour/SDG
practice/BMGDS
predetermine/ZGBDRS
predictability/U
preemptive/Y
prefer/BS
press/CGDS
probe/MSDG
problematic/U
process/MDSG
produce/ADSG
product/SVM
profile/MSDG
propulsion/SM
propulsive/Y
prospect/VMS
protective/PY
put/IS
quark/SM
question/GMDBS
queue/MGDS
quick/TRY
quiet/TRY
race/DSMG
random/PY
range/CGDS
rare/RYT
reachable/UP
read/GSJ
readable/U
recognize/SDGB
recruit/GLSD
refine/SDG
refuse/DSG
regard/ESDG
regressive/YP
rejection/MS
reliable/U
reluctant/Y
repeat/BDSG
respect/MDBSG
restrain/SDG
restrict/GVDS
rich/RT
rigorous/YP
robust/P
rumor/SMDG
run/AMS
rush/DSG
safe/RYT
sane/I
satisfiable/U
say/SG
scarce/Y
scatter/DSG
searcher/ASM
secure/IY
sequence/FSM
serialize/GBDS
serious/YP
serve's/A
serve/CAFGDS
set/AS
seven/H
severity/M
sexual/Y
shield/SDGM
short/RTY
shutter/GDMS
sign/ASGD
simple/TR
simulation/MS
six/H
slight/RYT
slow/YRT
small/RT
smooth/RTY
solvable/UAE
solve/ADSG
soon/RT
soul/MS
sound/UY
spacious/Y
spell/SMDG
spite/C
stability/I
stabilization/CSM
stabilize/CSDG
start/ASGMD
starve/SDG
stateless/P
stop/MS
storm/SM
strange/YRT
strong/RYT
subgroup/SGDM
subject/GVMDS
successful/UY
succinct/TRY
suffer/SZGDR
suit/MDGS
superconduct/SGVD
sustainable/U
symphony/SM
synchronization/CAS
synchronize/AGCDS
synchronous/UYP
tackle/SDG
tear/SGMD
temporary/F
ten/MHS
tend/ISGD
termination/C
text/FMS
thermal/Y
thousand/MS
threefolded/P
tight/YRT
time/MGJDS
tolerance/I
tour/F
traceable/AUY
track/SMDG
transaction/SM
transit/MDGS
transitive/IY
transmit/AS
transmitting/A
transport/BSDMG
treat/SMDG
trivial/Y
trustful/EYP
trustless/P
trustworthy/RPT
truthful/UYP
twenty/H
unconnected/YP
unroll/DGS
urgent/Y
usable/AU
use/MGDS
useful/PY
valid/I
validation/IMS
validity/I
variability/IS
verification/MS
verse/MS
version/FMS
vicious/YP
visibility/I
visit/ASGD
vocation/IAKFS
void/C
vote/CGDS
weak/YRT
weaken/SDG
whitelist/SDG
wide/YTR
wind/UGMDS
wise/YTR
workshop/MS
you/H
young/TR
